Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.028

Armed forces license plate collection.

"Armed forces license plate collection" means the collection of six separate license plate designs issued under RCW 46.18.210. Each license plate design displays a symbol representing one of the five branches of the armed forces, and one representing the national guard.

[ 2010 c 161 s 104.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.